Utah statutes.
76-10-402.   Manufacture, possession, sale, use, or attempted use of a
weapon of mass destruction prohibited -- Penalties.
A person who without lawful authority intentionally or knowingly manufactures,
possesses, sells, delivers, displays, uses, attempts to use, solicits the use
of, or conspires to use a weapon of mass destruction or a delivery system for
a weapon of mass destruction, including any biological agent, toxin, vector,
or delivery system as those terms are defined in this section, is guilty of a
first degree felony.
